Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 4

Telecommunications Services

7-52-401. Authority in relation to telecommunications equipment and services.

Every municipality operating an electric plant, whether pursuant to this chapter, any other public or private act or the provisions of the charter of the municipality, county or metropolitan government, has the power and is authorized, on behalf of its municipality acting through the authorization of the board or supervisory body having responsibility for the municipal electric plant, to acquire, construct, own, improve, operate, lease, maintain, sell, mortgage, pledge or otherwise dispose of any system, plant or equipment for the provision of telephone, telegraph, telecommunications services, or any other like system, plant, or equipment within or without the corporate or county limits of such municipality, and, with the consent of such other municipality, within the corporate or county limits of any other municipality, in compliance with title 65, chapters 4 and 5, and all other applicable state and federal laws, rules and regulations. A municipality shall only be authorized to provide telephone, telegraph or telecommunications services through its board or supervisory body having responsibility for the municipality's electric plant. A municipality providing any of the services authorized by this section may not dispose of all or substantially all of the system, plant and equipment used to provide such services except upon compliance with the procedures set forth in §7-52-132. Notwithstanding §65-4-101(6)(B) or any other provision of this code or of any private act, to the extent that any municipality provides any of the services authorized by this section, such municipality shall be subject to regulation by the Tennessee public utility commission in the same manner and to the same extent as other certificated providers of telecommunications services, including, but not limited to, rules or orders governing anti-competitive practices, and shall be considered as and have the duties of a public utility, as defined in §65-4-101, but only to the extent necessary to effect such regulation and only with respect to such municipality's provision of telephone, telegraph and communication services.

Acts 1997, ch. 531, § 2; 2017, ch. 94, § 14.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority” in the last sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Cross-References. Tennessee regulatory authority, title 65, ch. 1.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of municipal electric boards to provide telecommunications services. OAG 12-34, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 34 (3/12/12).

7-52-402. Subsidies — Municipal costs.

A municipality providing any of the services authorized by §7-52-401 shall not provide subsidies for such services. Notwithstanding that limitation, a municipality providing such services shall be authorized to:

Dedicate a reasonable portion of the electric plant to the provision of such services, the costs of which shall be allocated to such services for regulatory purposes; and

Lend funds, at a rate of interest not less than the highest rate then earned by the municipality on invested electric plant funds, to acquire, construct, and provide working capital for the system, plant, and equipment necessary to provide any of the services authorized under § 7-52-401; provided, that such interest costs shall be allocated to the cost of such services for regulatory purposes. Any loan of funds made pursuant to this section shall be approved in advance by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee and shall contain such provisions as are required by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee.

Acts 1997, ch. 531, § 3; 2010, ch. 868, § 19.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of municipal electric boards to provide telecommunications services. OAG 12-34, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 34 (3/12/12).

7-52-403. Applicability to municipalities — Municipalities subject to regulatory laws and rules.

To the extent that it provides any of the services authorized by § 7-52-401, a municipality has all the powers, obligations and authority granted entities providing telecommunications services under applicable laws of the United States or the state of Tennessee. To the extent that such authority and powers do not conflict with title 65, chapter 4 or 5, and any rules, regulations, or orders issued under title 65, chapter 4 or 5, a municipality providing any of the services authorized by § 7-52-401 has all the authority and powers with respect to such services as are enumerated in this chapter.

Notwithstanding the authorization granted in subsection (a), a municipal electric system shall not provide any of the services authorized by § 7-52-401 unrelated to its electric services within the service area of an existing telephone cooperative with fewer than one hundred thousand (100,000) total lines organized and operating under title 65, chapter 29, and therefore shall adhere to those regulations of the 1995 Tennessee Telecommunications Act and rules of the Tennessee public utility commission that are applicable to the telephone cooperatives, and specifically §§ 65-4-101 and 65-29-130.

Acts 1997, ch. 531, §§ 4, 9; 2017, ch. 94, § 15.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority” near the end of (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Cross-References. Tennessee regulatory authority, title 65, ch. 1.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of municipal electric boards to provide telecommunications services. OAG 12-34, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 34 (3/12/12).

7-52-404. Tax equivalent payments.

A municipality providing any of the services authorized by §7-52-401 shall make tax equivalent payments with respect to such services in the manner established for electric systems under part 3 of this chapter. For purposes of the calculation of such tax equivalent payments only, the system, plant, and equipment used to provide such services, shall be considered an electric plant, and the revenues received from such services shall be considered operating revenues. For regulatory purposes, a municipality shall allocate to the costs of any services authorized by §7-52-401 an amount equal to a reasonable determination of the state, local, and federal taxes that would be required to be paid for each fiscal year by a nongovernmental corporation that provides the identical services.

Acts 1997, ch. 531, § 5.

7-52-405. Allocation of costs by municipalities.

For regulatory purposes, a municipality shall allocate to the costs of providing any of the services authorized by §7-52-401:

An amount for attachments to poles owned by the municipality equal to the highest rate charged by the municipality to any other person or entity for comparable pole attachments; and

Any applicable rights-of-way fees, rentals, charges, or payments required by state or local law of a nongovernmental corporation that provides the identical services.

Acts 1997, ch. 531, § 6.

7-52-406. Licensing laws not superseded — Applicability to cable services.

Nothing in this part or in § 7-52-102(10) or § 7-52-117(d), as amended by chapter 531 of the Public Acts of 1997, shall be construed to allow a municipality to provide any service for which a license, certification, or registration is required under title 62, chapter 32, part 3.

Nothing in this part and § 7-52-102(10) or § 7-52-117(d), as amended by chapter 531 of the Public Acts of 1997, or any private act, charter, metropolitan charter, or amendments to any private act, charter or metropolitan charter, shall allow a municipality, county, metropolitan government, department, board or other entity of local government to provide any service for which a license, certification, or registration is required under title 62, chapter 32, part 3 or to provide pager service.

Acts 1997, ch. 531, §§ 10, 12; 1999, ch. 481, § 4.

7-52-407. Supersession of conflicting laws.

This part and §7-52-102(10) or §7-52-117(d), as amended by chapter 531 of the Public Acts of 1997, supersede any conflicting provisions of general law, private act, charter or metropolitan charter provisions.

Acts 1997, ch. 531, § 11.

7-52-408. [Repealed.]

Acts 2005, ch. 413, § 2; 2007, ch. 164, § 2; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 204, § 1, effective April 23, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former §7-52-408, concerned the Tennessee broadband task force.

7-52-409. [Repealed.]

Acts 2005, ch. 413, § 2; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 204, § 2, effective April 23, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former §7-52-409, concerned the quorum and the appointment of co-chair and meetings.

7-52-410. [Repealed.]

Acts 2005, ch. 413, § 3; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 204, § 3, effective April 23, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former §7-52-410, concerned the baseline assessment of broadband deployment.

7-52-411. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §7-52-411 (Acts 2005, ch. 413, § 1), concerning the deadline for completion of baseline assessment, was repealed by Acts 2007, ch. 164, § 4, effective May 15, 2007.